Wyoming, session 2025, HB0002.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 23-2-101(e) is amended to read:

23-2-101. Fees; restrictions; nonresident application
fee; nonresident licenses; verification of residency
required; donation of refunded application fees.

HB0002

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0057
(e) Resident and nonresident license applicants shall
pay an application fee in an amount specified by this
subsection upon submission of an application for purchase
of any limited quota drawing for big or trophy game license
or wild bison license. The resident Application fee fees
shall be five dollars ($5.00) established by rule and shall
not exceed twenty dollars ($20.00) for resident
applications and the seventy-five dollars ($75.00) for
nonresident application fee shall be fifteen dollars
($15.00) applications for all personal applications made at
the same time. The application fee is in addition to the
fees prescribed by subsections (f) and (j) of this section
and by W.S. 23-2-107 and shall be payable to the department
either directly or through an authorized selling agent of
the department. At the beginning of each month, the
commission shall set aside all of the fees collected during
calendar year 1980 and not to exceed twenty-five percent
(25%) of the fees collected thereafter pursuant to this
subsection to establish and maintain a working balance of
five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00), to compensate
owners or lessees of property damaged by game animals and
game birds.

HB0002

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0057
Section 2. The game and fish commission shall
promulgate all rules necessary to implement the provisions
of this act not later than July 1, 2025.

Section 3.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2025.

(b) Sections 2 and 3 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
HB0002